zh-TW: 鈴鼓鼓皮材質: Fiberskyn; 聚酯薄膜 (Mylar); 天然獸皮; 合成材質; 其他
ko: 탬버린 헤드 소재: 파이버스킨; 마일라; 천연 가죽; 합성 소재; 기타
nl: Materiaal tambourijnvel: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Natuurlijk vel; Synthetisch; Overig
cs: Materiál hlavy tamburíny: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Přírodní kůže; Syntetický; Jiné
da: Materiale i tamburinskind: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Naturskind; Syntetisk; Andet
fi: Tamburiinin pään materiaali: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Luonnonnahka; Synteettinen; Muu
pt-PT: Material da membrana da pandeireta: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Pele natural; Sintético; Outro
fr: Matériau de la peau du tambourin: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Peau naturelle; Synthétique; Autre
pt-BR: Material da membrana do pandeiro: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Pele natural; Sintético; Outro
nb: Materiale i tamburinhode: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Naturskinn; Syntetisk; Annet
vi: Chất liệu mặt trống lắc tay: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Da tự nhiên; Tổng hợp; Khác
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำหน้ากลองแทมบูรีน: Fiberskyn; ไมลาร์; หนังแท้; หนังสังเคราะห์; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Tambūrino galvutės medžiaga: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Natūrali oda; Sintetika; Kita
sl-SI: Material opne tamburina: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Naravna koža; Sintetika; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на мембраната на тамбурина: Fiberskyn; Майлар; Естествена кожа; Синтетика; Друго
ru: Материал мембраны бубна: Fiberskyn; Майлар; Натуральная кожа; Синтетика; Другое
hr-HR: Materijal glave tamburina: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Prirodna koža; Sintetika; Ostalo
sv: Material för tamburinens skinn: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Naturskinn; Syntetisk; Annat
es: Material para parches de la pandereta: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Piel natural; Sintético; Otro
it: Materiale della membrana del tamburello: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Pelle naturale; Sintetico; Altro
sk-SK: Materiál hlavy tamburíny: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Prírodná koža; Syntetický materiál; Iné
tr: Tef deri malzemesi: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Doğal deri; Sentetik; Diğer
ja: トロンボーンヘッド材質: ファイバースキン; マイラー; 天然皮革; 合成素材; その他
de: Material des Tambourinfells: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Naturfell; Synthetisch; Sonstige
zh-CN: 铃鼓鼓面材质: 仿小牛皮; 聚酯薄膜; 天然皮; 合成材料; 其他
ro-RO: Material al membranei tamburinei: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Piele naturală; Sintetic; Altele
el: Υλικό μεμβράνης ντεφιού: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Φυσικό δέρμα; Συνθετικό; Άλλο
hu: Tamburin fejrész anyaga: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Természetes bőr; Szintetikus; Egyéb
pl: Materiał membrany tamburynu: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Skóra naturalna; Syntetyczny; Inny
en: Tambourine head material: Fiberskyn; Mylar; Natural skin; Synthetic; Other